New Mexico, session 2026, SB245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. A new section of Chapter 30, Article 9 NMSA 1978 is enacted to read: "[NEW MATERIAL] INDECENT EXPOSURE TO A CHILD OUT OF PUBLIC VIEW--PENALTY.-- A. Indecent exposure to a child out of public view consists of a person eighteen years of age or older knowingly and intentionally exposing the person's primary genital area to a child in a lewd and lascivious manner, when the person and child are in a nonpublic place. B. Whoever commits indecent exposure to a child out of public view is guilty of a fourth degree felony. C. As used in this section: (1) "child" means a person under eighteen years of age; and (2) "primary genital area" means the mons pubis, penis, testicles, mons veneris, vulva or vagina." - 2 -